Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201385-1603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act:

(1) Agent means any person who owns any interest in, is employed
by, or regularly represents for remuneration a private postsecondary career
school located within or outside this state who (a) by solicitation made in
this state enrolls or seeks to enroll a resident of this state for education
offered by such school, (b) offers to award educational credentials for remuneration
on behalf of any such school, or (c) holds himself or herself out to residents
of this state as representing such a school;

(2) Agent's permit means a nontransferable, written authorization
issued to a natural person by the department which allows that person to solicit
or enroll any resident of this state for education in a private postsecondary
career school;

(3) Authorization to operate means approval by the department
to operate a private postsecondary career school in this state;

(4) Board means the State Board of Education;

(5) Branch facility means a facility (a) which is separate
from a principal facility, (b) which offers a full program and full student
services, (c) which is under the supervision of an onsite director or administrator,
and (d)(i) the ownership, management, and control of which are the same as
the principal facility, which principal facility is responsible for the delivery
of all services, or (ii) at which education is offered by a franchisee of
a franchisor authorized to operate as a private postsecondary career school
pursuant to the act if the franchisor establishes the course curriculum and
guidelines for teaching at the franchisee's facility;

(6) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;

(7) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Education;

(8) Course of study or instruction means a program of study,
training, or instruction consisting of a series of lessons or classes which
are coordinated as a curriculum or program of instruction to prepare or qualify
individuals or improve or upgrade the skills needed for employment, career
opportunities, or any specific occupation;

(9) Department means the State Department of Education;

(10) Education or educational services means any class, course,
or program of occupational training, instruction, or study;

(11) Entity means any individual, company, firm, society,
group, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust,
or other person;

(12) Grant, with respect to educational credentials, means
award, sell, confer, bestow, or give;

(13) Home study school means a school which provides correspondence
lesson materials prepared in a sequential and logical order for study and
completion by a student on his or her own, with completed lessons returned
by the student to the school for evaluation and subsequent return to the student,
including those schools which offer instruction by home study in combination
with in-residence training;

(14) Offer includes, in addition to its usual meaning, advertising,
publicizing, soliciting, or encouraging any person, directly or indirectly,
in any form, to perform a described act;

(15) Out-of-state school means any private postsecondary career school which has
its place of instruction or its principal location outside the boundaries
of this state and which offers or conducts courses of instruction or subjects
on the premises of the school, or provides correspondence or home study lesson
materials, or offers or provides Nebraska students with courses of instruction
or subjects through activities engaged in or conducted outside the boundaries
of Nebraska;

(16) Principal facility or main school means a private postsecondary
career school located in the State of Nebraska;

(17) Private postsecondary career school means any organization
or business enterprise which is not specifically exempt under section 85-1604 and which offers a course of study or instruction for which tuition
is charged, even though
the organization's or business enterprise's principal efforts may not be exclusively
educational in nature;

(18) Resident school means any school offering courses of
instruction to its students on the school's premises;

(19) Separate classroom means a supplemental training space
(a) which is located near the main school for the purpose of expanding the
educational offerings or for training an overflow of students who cannot be
accommodated at the main school, (b) which is close enough to the main school
to assure immediate supervision and administration of all essential student
services by the main school and ready access by students to the student services
available, and (c) in which the only required onsite service is teaching;
and

(20) Short-term training means classes, courses, or programs
of instruction or study that are offered for the purpose of training, preparing,
or improving a person for an occupation when (a) the total hours of instruction
required for completion is sixteen clock hours or less and (b) no final course
grade is given to persons enrolled.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 370, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 519;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2803;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 30;

Laws 2013, LB410, § 18.